Illinois, session 104th, SB2489.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 16-107.8 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/16-107.8 new)7    Sec. 16-107.8. Demand response virtual power plant 8program.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Aggregator" means a party, other than the electric 11utility or its affiliate, that (i) represents and aggregates 12the load of participating customers who collectively have the 13ability to curtail 100 kilowatts or more through demand 14response technologies and (ii) is responsible for performance 15of the aggregation in the virtual power plant program.16    "Demand response technologies" means applications or 17solutions, not including electricity generators, that can be 18controlled to respond to pricing or provide services, 19including decreasing peak electricity demand or shifting 20demand from peak to off-peak periods. "Demand response 21technologies" may include, but are not limited to, connected 22devices such as behind-the-meter energy storage systems, smart 23thermostats, air conditioning units, electric vehicle   SB2489- 2 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1batteries, and electric vehicle supply equipment.2    "Distributed energy resources management system" or 3"DERMS" means a platform that may be used by distribution 4system operators or utilities to integrate grid resources, 5such as distributed energy resources, into system operations.6    "Energy storage system" has the meaning set forth in 7subsection (a) of Section 16-107.6.8    "Event" means a time period defined consistent with the 9requirements of this Section by the applicable electric 10utility where deployment of demand response technologies is 11measured and compensated under this Section.12    "Export" means the discharge of energy from an energy 13storage system to the distribution grid in response to pricing 14or to provide services, including decreasing peak electricity 15demand or shifting demand from peak to off-peak periods.16    "Participating customer" means a retail customer, as 17defined in Section 16-102, with one or more demand response 18technologies.19    (b) The General Assembly finds that when demand response 20technologies commit to deployment at times of stress on the 21grid and in wholesale energy markets, the actual deployment 22benefits all customers of the utility with enhanced grid 23reliability and protection from retail and wholesale price 24increases and that those socialized goods should be encouraged 25and compensated.26    (c) Within 60 days after the effective date of this   SB2489- 3 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each electric 2utility serving more than 300,000 customers as of January 1, 32025 shall propose one or more tariffs applicable to demand 4response technologies. The tariffs shall be consistent with 5the following:6        (1) Each request by the utility for an aggregator or 7    participating customer to deploy demand response 8    technologies participating in the program as identified in 9    advance by the aggregator or participating customer shall 10    be an event. Each utility shall rely on the demand 11    response technologies addressed within a tariff for a 12    minimum number of events specified in the tariff.13        (2) In exchange for an aggregator, or a participating 14    customer not using an aggregator facilitating curtailment 15    through demand response technologies, the utility shall, 16    after demonstrated performance by the aggregator or 17    participating customer, compensate the aggregator or 18    participating customer in a manner to be determined by the 19    Commission. The Commission may consider separate 20    compensation for response to events called on less than 24 21    hours notice and compensation for response to events 22    called on 24 hours or more notice. In determining the 23    value of the performance payment, the Commission shall at 24    minimum consider the benefits to the utility and 25    ratepayers of peak remediation, reduced capacity and 26    transmission allocations to the applicable regional   SB2489- 4 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1    transmission organization zone, and a reasonable 2    estimation of the value of reduced transmission and 3    distribution investment and other grid services. The value 4    shall be set to encourage robust participation. At least 5    30 days prior to proposing any tariff relating to demand 6    response technologies, utilities shall jointly conduct at 7    least one meeting with interested potential aggregators 8    and participating customers to identify types of demand 9    response technologies and compensation suitable for 10    inclusion in the tariff.11        (3) An aggregator or participating customer applying 12    individually shall represent that it has identified for 13    participation demand response technologies with an 14    aggregate curtailment capacity of at least 100 kilowatts 15    or any amount greater than that amount. Nothing in the 16    tariffs shall require a particular participating customer, 17    whether using an aggregator or not, to deploy at any 18    particular time.19        (4) The utility shall not send or receive signals 20    directly to or from any participating customer represented 21    by an aggregator for an event under the demand response 22    virtual power plant program.23        (5) The aggregator may have capabilities to receive 24    dispatch signals from utilities or utility-contracted 25    DERMS providers through communication protocols, such as 26    IEEE 2030.5 or OpenADR, or through such other protocol as   SB2489- 5 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1    the Commission may approve. To facilitate adoption and 2    participation, the utility shall also allow and enable 3    participating customers to expeditiously share customer 4    information with aggregators and provide dispatch signals 5    in the form of an email or mutually agreeable 6    implementation.7        (6) A participating customer with multiple demand 8    response technologies may enroll the technologies either 9    directly without an aggregator or through one or more 10    aggregators in applicable programs under the tariffs 11    approved under this Section, so long as no particular 12    technology is accounted for more than once. An aggregator, 13    or a participating customer not using an aggregator, may 14    collect and rely on data created by the demand response 15    technologies for the purpose of demonstrating performance 16    in response to an event.17        (7) A participating customer may enroll in the demand 18    response virtual power plant program directly if eligible 19    or through an aggregator for one or more years and the 20    electric utility shall not set a minimum or maximum length 21    of participation for demand response technologies. The 22    utility shall not limit the number of participating 23    customers, nor shall any customer be prohibited from 24    participating due to its rate class.25        (8) The electric utility may include reasonable 26    requirements for participation consistent with this   SB2489- 6 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1    subsection (c) except that the utility may not require 2    collateral from a participating customer or an aggregator 3    and neither the utility nor entities with which the 4    utility shares a common parent may be an aggregator. The 5    electric utility shall not penalize a participating 6    customer or aggregator for a participating customer 7    exporting during an event and the electric utility shall 8    not require preapproval for customer export during an 9    event.10        (9) The utility shall recover the costs of the demand 11    response virtual power plant program through delivery 12    rates, including delivery rates authorized by the 13    multi-year rate plan.14    (d) The Commission shall approve or approve with 15modifications the tariffs filed by each utility pursuant to 16subsection (c) within 240 days of filing. At any time, the 17utility may propose revisions to the tariff required under 18this Section and the Commission may approve such revisions if, 19in addition to requirements under Article IX of this Act, such 20revisions are consistent with the requirements of this 21Section.22    (e) Not more than 6 months after 2 full delivery years of 23operation of the tariffs authorized under this Section, the 24Commission shall issue a report to the General Assembly 25assessing the value and efficacy of the demand response 26virtual power plant program, including proposals for   SB2489- 7 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1expansions or modifications.2    (f) Nothing in the demand response virtual power plant 3program shall either prevent the participating customer from 4participating, directly or through a third-party aggregator, 5in any other program, including any program required or 6authorized by Section 16-107.6 of this Act.7    (g) The Commission may consider approving additional 8compensation to aggregators to the extent that the 9aggregators' participating customers or participating 10customers are located in equity investment eligible 11communities, as defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 12Agency Act.13    (h) The tariffs approved by the Commission shall not 14reflect any additional charges, fees, or insurance 15requirements imposed on persons owning or operating demand 16response technologies beyond those imposed on similarly 17situated customers that do not own or operate such.18    (i) If a utility issuing tariffs under this Section 19conducts measurement and verification prescribed by the 20Commission, notwithstanding anything to the contrary, all 21curtailment associated with demand response technologies 22taking service under such tariffs shall be counted towards 23such utility's peak load reduction performance metric 24authorized by item (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) 25of subsection (e) of Section 16-108.18 of this Act and such 26utility's demand response obligations under Section 8-103B of   SB2489- 8 -LRB104 08079 AAS 18125 b1this Act. The Commission shall not require demand response 2technologies to participate in any capacity or demand response 3markets or programs as a condition of the load attributable to 4participating systems to count toward the utility's peak load 5reduction performance metric or demand response obligations.6    (j) The Commission shall implement this Section in a 7complementary manner with other virtual power plant programs 8under the Commission's jurisdiction in order to make the 9programs available to utility customers compatible for the 10benefit of the electric grid and to enhance electric service 11reliability.